Louisiana, session 2026, HB1182.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 37:3006(introductory paragraph) and (2), 3007, 3008, 3009(B) and
(D), 3012(B)(3), and 3013(A) are hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§3006. Requirements for licensure
An applicant applying for a license as an occupational therapist or as an
occupational therapy assistant shall file a written application on forms provided by
the board, showing to the satisfaction of the board that he the applicant:
* * *
(2) Has successfully completed the academic and supervised field work
experience requirements to sit for the "Certification Examination for Occupational
Therapist, Registered or the Certification Examination for occupational therapy
assistant" and is approved by the board and pass the National Board for Certification
in Occupational Therapy (NBCOT) certification examination.
§3007. Examination for licensure
A. The board shall use the examination administered by an independent
agency under contract with the American Occupational Therapy Association, Inc.
(AOTA), National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy (NBCOT) to
administer the examinations for licensure under this Chapter.
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1182 ENROLLED
B. Any person applying for licensure shall, in addition to demonstrating his
eligibility in accordance with the requirements of R.S. 37:3006, make application to
the board for review of proof of his current certification by the American
Occupational Therapy Association, Inc. (AOTA), National Board for Certification
in Occupational Therapy (NBCOT) on a form and in such a manner as the board
shall prescribe. The application shall be accompanied by the fee fixed in accordance
with the provisions of R.S. 37:3013. The board shall determine the criteria for
satisfactory performance on the examination, using the American Occupational
Therapy Association, Inc., National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy
(NBCOT) criteria as a minimum score. A person who fails an examination may
reapply.
C. Applicants for licensure shall be examined at a time and place established
by the American Occupational Therapy Association, Inc. (AOTA) National Board
for Certification in Occupational Therapy (NBCOT). Examinations shall be given
at least twice each year within the state.
§3008. Waiver of requirements for licensure
A. The board shall waive the examination and grant a license to any person
certified prior to the effective date of this Chapter as an Occupational Therapist,
Registered (OTR) or a Certified Occupational Therapy Assistant (COTA) by the
American Occupational Therapy Association, Inc. (AOTA), National Board for
Certification in Occupational Therapy (NBCOT) and who otherwise meets the
criteria of provisions of R.S. 37:3006 and who is domiciled in the state on the date
this Chapter becomes effective. In order to obtain the benefit of this waiver, an
applicant shall make an application for a license no later than six months after the
effective date of this Chapter.
B. The board may waive the examination and grant a license to any applicant
who presents proof of current licensure as an occupational therapist or occupational
therapy assistant in another state, the District of Columbia, or a territory of the
United States which requires standards for licensure considered by the board to be
equivalent to the requirements for licensure of this Chapter, provided that such state,
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1182 ENROLLED
district or territory accords similar privileges of licensure without examination to
holders of a license under this Chapter.
C. The board shall waive the educational and examination requirements and
grant a license to any person who gives proof of current employment, either on a
probational or a permanent basis, in the classified state service, and who is classified
therein as an Occupational Therapy Aide I, Occupational Therapy Aide II,
Occupational Therapist I, Occupational Therapist II, or Occupational Therapist III;
on the date this Chapter becomes effective.
An Occupational Therapy Aide I, Occupational Therapy Aide II, or
Occupational Therapist I shall be licensed as an occupational therapy assistant. An
Occupational Therapist II or an Occupational Therapist III shall be licensed as an
occupational therapist. These licensing designations will in no way restrict the
authority of the Louisiana State Department of Civil Service to establish guidelines
and qualifications for those employees within the classified service or in no way
restrict the power of the Civil Service Department to establish promotional ladders
for such employees. In order to obtain the benefit of this waiver, an applicant shall
make application for a license no later than six (6) months after the effective date of
this Chapter.
D. The board shall waive the examination and grant a license to any person
who is domiciled in the state on the date this Chapter becomes effective, and who is
a graduate of a curriculum of a member nation of the World Federation of
Occupational Therapists (WFOT). In order to obtain the benefit of this waiver, an
applicant shall make application for a license no later than six (6) months after the
effective date of this Chapter.
§3009. Issuance of license
* * *
B. Any person who is issued a license as an occupational therapist under the
terms of this Chapter may use the words "occupational therapist", "licensed
occupational therapist", or he may use the letters "LOT", "OT" in connection with
his name or place of business to denote his licensure. In addition, any person
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1182 ENROLLED
certified or registered by the American Occupational Therapy Association, Inc.,
National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy (NBCOT) may use the
words "licensed occupational therapist, registered" or "occupational therapist,
registered" or "LOTR" or "OTR".
* * *
D. The board shall may establish policies which allow for a challenge of
denial of license. This challenge shall be heard in an open hearing in accordance
with due process.
* * *
§3012. Renewal of license
* * *
B.
* * *
(3) The continuing education requirements shall do not apply to individuals
working as occupational therapists in state facilities or employed by a state agency.
* * *
§3013. Fees
A. The board shall fix fees in a manner established by its rules. Initial fees
shall not exceed the following amounts:
(1) Application fee Initial OT license application fee. .. $50 $150
(2) Issuance of Initial OTA license application fee. .... $25 $100
(3) Temporary license fee OT/OTA................. $25 $50
(4) Renewal of OT license fee..................... $25 $100
(5) Reinstatement Renewal of OTA license fee........ $25 $75
(6) Late renewal Reinstatement of OT license fee...... $35 $100
(7) Reciprocity Reinstatement of OTA license fee. .... $75 $100
(8) Late renewal fee OT.......................... $100
(9) Late renewal fee OTA. ....................... $75
(10)Reciprocity................................. $75
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1182 ENROLLED
Fees for occupational therapy assistants licensure shall be no more than
two-thirds of those for occupational therapist licensure.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.